nl: Bouwmaterialen > Gereedschapaccessoires > Schuuraccessoires > Schuurpapier en schuursponzen: Schuurrollen; Schuurvellen; Polijstpads; Schuurbanden; Schuurkoorden; Schuurpads; Schuurplaten; Schuursponzen; Staalwol
hr-HR: Željezarija > Dodaci za alat > Pribor za pjeskarenje > Brusni papir i spužve za brušenje: Brusni valjci; Brusni listovi; Jastučići za poliranje; Brusne trake; Brusni konac; Jastučići za brušenje; Brusne ploče; Brusne spužve; Čelična vuna
el: Υλικά κατασκευών > Αξεσουάρ εργαλείων > Αξεσουάρ λείανσης > Χαρτί Λείανσης & σφουγγάρια τριψίματος: Ρολά λείανσης; Φύλλα λείανσης; Επιθέματα στίλβωσης; Ταινίες λείανσης; Σχοινιά λείανσης; Επιθέματα λείανσης; Πλάκες λείανσης; Σφουγγάρια τριψίματος; Σύρμα καθαρισμού (ατσαλόμαλλο)
en: Hardware > Tool Accessories > Sanding Accessories > Sandpaper & Sanding Sponges: Abrasive Rolls; Abrasive Sheets; Polishing Pads; Sanding Belts; Sanding Cords; Sanding Pads; Sanding Plates; Sanding Sponges; Steel Wool
sk-SK: Náradie > Náradie a príslušenstvo > Príslušenstvo na brúsenie > Brúsny papier a brúsne špongie: Brúsne kotúče; Brúsne papiere; Leštiace kotúče; Brúsne pásy; Brúsne špagáty; Brúsne podložky; Brúsne dosky; Brúsne špongie; Drôtenka
zh-TW: 硬體 > 工具配件 > 磨砂配件 > 砂紙/磨砂海綿: 砂紙卷; 全張砂紙; 拋光墊; 砂布環帶; 磨砂繩卷; 磨砂墊; 打磨板; 研磨海綿; 鋼絲絨
ru: Оборудование и технические изделия > Аксессуары для инструментов > Аксессуары для шлифования > Шлифовальные материалы и инструменты: Шлифовальная бумага в рулонах; Шлифовальные листы; Полировальные круги; Шлифовальные ленты; Абразивные шнуры; Шлифовальные круги; Шлифовальные пластины; Шлифовальные губки; Стальная вата
fi: Rakentaminen > Työkalujen lisätarvikkeet > Hiontatarvikkeet > Hiekkapaperi ja hiontasienet: Hiomapaperirullat; Hiomapaperiarkit; Kiillotustyynyt; Hiomanauhat; Hiomalangat; Hiomatyynyt; Hiomalevyt; Hiomasienet; Teräsvilla
pl: Sprzęt > Akcesoria do narzędzi > Akcesoria do szlifowania > Papier ścierny i gąbki ścierne: Rolki ścierne; Arkusze ścierne; Pady polerskie; Pasy ścierne; Sznury ścierne; Pady ścierne; Tarcze ścierne; Gąbki ścierne; Wełna stalowa
es: Bricolaje > Accesorios para herramientas > Accesorios de lijar > Papel y esponjas de lija: Rollos abrasivos; Hojas abrasivas; Almohadillas de pulido; Bandas de lijado; Cordones de lijado; Almohadillas de lijado; Placas de lijado; Esponjas de lijado; Estropajo de acero
it: Articoli di ferramenta > Accessori per attrezzi > Accessori per carteggio > Carta vetrata e spugne carteggio: Rulli abrasivi; Fogli abrasivi; Tamponi per lucidatura; Nastri abrasivi; Cavi abrasivi; Cuscinetti abrasivi; Piastre abrasive; Spugne abrasive; Lana d'acciaio
pt-BR: Ferragens > Acessórios para ferramentas > Acessórios para lixamento > Esponjas abrasivas para lixas e lixamento: Rolos abrasivos; Folhas abrasivas; Almofadas de polimento; Cintas de lixa; Cabos de lixa; Almofadas de lixa; Placas de lixa; Esponjas de lixa; Lã de aço
sv: Metallprodukter > Verktygstillbehör > Tillbehör till slippapper > Slippapper och slipsvamp: Sliprullar; Slipark; Polerkuddar; Slipband; Slipsnören; Slipdynor; Slipplattor; Slipsvampar; Stålull
fr: Quincaillerie > Accessoires d’outils > Accessoires de ponçage > Papier de verre et éponges à poncer: Rouleaux abrasifs; Feuilles abrasives; Tampons de polissage; Bandes de ponçage; Cordons de ponçage; Tampons de ponçage; Plaques de ponçage; Éponges de ponçage; Paille de fer
de: Heimwerkerbedarf > Werkzeugzubehör > Schleifzubehör > Schleifpapier & Schleifschwämme: Schleifrollen; Schleifblätter; Polierkissen; Schleifbänder; Schleifschnüre; Schleifkissen; Schleifscheiben; Schleifschwämme; Stahlwolle
ja: DIY用品 > 工具関連用品 > ヤスリ関連用品 > 紙ヤスリ・スポンジヤスリ: 研磨ロール; 研磨シート; 研磨パッド; ヤスリベルト; 紐ヤスリ; ヤスリパッド; ヤスリプレート; ヤスリスポンジ; スチールウール
vi: Phần cứng > Phụ kiện dụng cụ > Phụ kiện chà nhám > Miếng bọt biển & giấy nhám: Cuộn nhám; Giấy nhám; Đệm đánh bóng; Dây đai nhám; Dây chà nhám; Đế chà nhám; Tấm chà nhám; Xốp chà nhám; Bùi nhùi thép
cs: Kutilství a řemeslo > Nástroje a nářadí – příslušenství > Příslušenství pro ruční broušení > Smirkové papíry a brusné houby: Role brusného papíru; Archy brusného papíru; Lešticí podložky; Brusné pásy; Brusné šňůry; Brusné podložky; Brusní desky; Brusné houby; Ocelová vlna
pt-PT: Equipamento > Acessórios de ferramentas > Acessórios de lixagem > Folhas de lixa e esponjas de lixa: Rolos abrasivos; Folhas abrasivas; Esfregões de polimento; Cintos de lixa; Cabos de lixa; Esfregões de lixa; Placas de lixa; Esponjas de lixa; Lã de aço
da: Isenkram > Værktøj – tilbehør > Slibning med sandpapir – tilbehør > Sandpapir og slibesvampe: Slibende ruller; Slibende ark; Polerpuder; Slibebånd; Slibesnore; Slibepuder; Slibeplader; Slibesvampe; Ståluld
th: ฮาร์ดแวร์ > อุปกรณ์เครื่องมือ > อุปกรณ์สำหรับขัดกระดาษทราย > กระดาษทรายและฟองน้ำกระดาษทราย: ม้วนขัด; กระดาษขัด; แผ่นขัด; ผ้ากระดาษทรายสายพาน; สายกระดาษทราย; แป้นกระดาษทราย; แผ่นกระดาษทราย; ฟองน้ำกระดาษทราย; ฝอยเหล็ก
sl-SI: Gradbena oprema > Dodatki za orodje > Dodatki za brušenje > Brusni papir in brusne gobice: Brusni zvitki; Brusilni listi; Blazinice za poliranje; Brusni trakovi; Brusne vrvice; Brusne blazinice; Brusne plošče; Brusne gobice; Jeklena volna
ko: 철물 > 공구 부대용품 > 샌딩 부대용품 > 사포/스펀지 사포: 연마 롤; 연마 시트; 연마 패드; 벨트 사포; 코드 사포; 패드 사포; 사포 플레이트; 스펀지 사포; 철솜
hu: Hardver > Szerszám-kiegészítők > Csiszoláskiegészítők > Csiszolópapír és csiszolószivacsok: Csiszolótekercsek; Csiszolólapok; Polírozópárnák; Csiszolószalagok; Csiszolózsinórok; Csiszolópárnák; Csiszolólemezek; Csiszolószivacsok; Acélgyapot
lt-LT: Techninė įranga > Įrankių priedai > Šlifavimo priedai > Švitrinis popierius ir šlifavimo kempinės: Abrazyviniai ritinėliai; Abrazyviniai lakštai; Poliravimo trinkelės; Šlifavimo juostos; Šlifavimo virvelės; Šlifavimo padėklai; Šlifavimo plokštės; Šlifavimo kempinės; Plieno vata
ro-RO: Feronerie > Accesorii pentru unelte > Accesorii pentru șlefuire > Hârtie și bureți cu șmirghel: Role abrazive; Foi abrazive; Tampoane de lustruit; Curele de sablat; Corzi de sablat; Tampoane de sablat; Farfurii pentru sablat; Bureți cu șmirghel; Burete de sârmă
nb: Maskinvare > Verktøytilbehør > Pussetilbehør > Sandpapir og sandsvamper: Sliperuller; Slipeark; Poleringsputer; Sandbelter; Sandsnorer; Sandputer; Sandplater; Sandsvamper; Stålull
tr: Hırdavat > Alet Aksesuarları > Zımparalama Aksesuarları > Zımpara ve Zımparalama Süngerleri: Aşındırıcı Rulolar; Aşındırıcı Yapraklar; Parlatma Pedleri; Zımpara Bantları; Zımpara Kabloları; Zımpara Pedleri; Zımpara Plakaları; Zımpara Süngerleri; Çelik Yün
bg-BG: Железария > Аксесоари за инструменти > Аксесоари за шлайфане > Шкурка и гъби за шлайфане: Абразивни ролки; Абразивни листове; Полиращи подложки; Шлифовъчни ленти; Шлифовъчни шнурове; Шлифовъчни подложки; Шлифовъчни плочи; Шлифовъчни гъби; Стоманена вълна
zh-CN: 五金/硬件 > 工具配件 > 砂磨配件 > 砂纸/磨砂海绵擦: 砂轮; 砂板; 抛光垫; 砂磨带; 砂磨绳; 砂磨垫; 砂磨板; 砂磨海绵; 钢丝绒